Maryland, session 2026, SB0676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–1001.
(a) This section applies to a threat made by oral or written communication or
electronic communication, as defined in § 3–805(a) of this title.
(b) A person may not knowingly threaten to commit or threaten to cause to be
committed a crime of violence, as defined in § 14–101 of this article, that would place five
or more people at substantial risk of death or serious physical injury, as defined in § 3–201
of this title, if the threat were carried out.
(c) (1) A person who violates this section is guilty of the [misdemeanor]
FELONY of making a threat of mass violence and on conviction is subject to imprisonment
not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding $10,000 or both.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0676*

SENATE BILL 676
(2) In addition to the penalties provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection,
a court shall order a person convicted under this section to reimburse the appropriate unit
of federal, State, or local government or other person for any expenses and losses incurred
in responding to the unlawful threat unless the court states on the record the reasons why
reimbursement would be inappropriate.
(d) A person who violates this section may be indicted, prosecuted, tried, and
convicted in any county where:
(1) the threat was received;
(2) the threat was made; or
(3) the consequences of the threat occurred.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.